Hawaii statutes.
§286-29 Improper representation as official
inspection station. Any person who shall in any manner represent that the
business operated at any location is an official inspection station without a
permit issued by the department under section 286-27, or any person other than
a person operating an inspection station under a permit granted by the
department who issues a certificate of inspection shall be fined not more than
$1,000 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both. [L 1967, c 214, pt of §2;
HRS §286-29; am L 1968, c 48, §2(c)]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next